Hawaii statutes.
§339D-11 Financial and proprietary
information; report. (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
financial or proprietary information, including trade secrets, commercial
information, and business plans, submitted to the department under this chapter
is confidential and is exempt from public disclosure to the extent permitted by
chapter 92F.

(b) The department shall compile the
information submitted by covered television manufacturers and issue a report to
the legislature no later than April 1, 2012, and annually each year thereafter.
[L Sp 2008, c 13, pt of §2; am L 2009, c 183, §14]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next